Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-715
Action by minor parent.

A minor parent, or a guardian or other legal representative of a minor parent, may maintain a proceeding on behalf of or for the benefit of the minor's child.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 15.